dictsource/he_rules
      הֱיך (_ heiX||
      הֱיל heil
      הֱימ heim
      הֱים (_ heim||
      הֱינ hein
      הֱין (_ hein||
      הֱיס heis
      הֱיע hei?
      הֱיפ heif
      הֱיף (_ heif||
      הֱיצ heits
      הֱיץ (_ heits||
      הֱיק heik
      הֱיר heiQ
      הֱיש heiS
      הֱישׁ heiS
      הֱישׂ heis
      הֱית heit
      הֱיאּ hei?'
      הֱיבּ heiB'
      הֱיגּ heig'
      הֱידּ heid'
      הֱיהּ heih'
      הֱיוּ heiv'
      הֱיזּ heiz'
      הֱיחּ heix'
      הֱיטּ heit'
      הֱייּ heij'
      הֱיכּ heik'
      הֱיךּ (_ heik'||
      הֱילּ heil'
      הֱימּ heim'
      הֱיםּ (_ heim'||
      הֱינּ hein'
      הֱיןּ (_ hein'||
      הֱיסּ heis'
      הֱיעּ hei?'
      הֱיפּ heip'
      הֱיףּ (_ heip'||
      הֱיצּ heit's
      הֱיץּ (_ heit's||
      הֱיקּ heik'
      הֱירּ heiQ'
      הֱישּ heiS'
      הֱישּׁ heiS'
      הֱישּׂ heis'
      הֱיתּ heit'
      הֵ (% ha
      הֵא he?
      הֵב hev
      הֵג heg
      הֵד hed
      הֵה heh
      הֵו hev
      הֵז hez
      הֵח hex
      הֵט het
      הֵי hej
      הֵכ heX
      הֵך (_ heX||
      הֵל hel
      הֵמ hem
      הֵם (_ hem||
      הֵנ hen
      הֵן (_ hen||
      הֵס hes
      הֵע he?
      הֵפ hef
      הֵף (_ hef||
      הֵצ hets
      הֵץ (_ hets||
      הֵק hek
      הֵר heQ
      הֵש heS
      הֵשׁ heS
      הֵשׂ hes
      הֵת het
      הֵאּ he?'
      הֵבּ heB'
      הֵגּ heg'
      הֵדּ hed'
      הֵהּ heh'
      הֵוּ hev'
      הֵזּ hez'
      הֵחּ hex'
      הֵטּ het'
      הֵיּ hej'
      הֵכּ hek'
      הֵךּ (_ hek'||
      הֵלּ hel'
      הֵמּ hem'
      הֵםּ (_ hem'||
      הֵנּ hen'
      הֵןּ (_ hen'||
      הֵסּ hes'
      הֵעּ he?'
      הֵפּ hep'
      הֵףּ (_ hep'||
      הֵצּ het's
      הֵץּ (_ het's||
      הֵקּ hek'
      הֵרּ heQ'
      הֵשּ heS'
      הֵשּׁ heS'
      הֵשּׂ hes'
      הֵתּ het'
      הֵא (% ha
      הֵאא he??
      הֵאב he?v
      הֵאג he?g
      הֵאד he?d
      הֵאה he?h
      הֵאו he?v
      הֵאז he?z
      הֵאח he?x
      הֵאט he?t
      הֵאי he?j
      הֵאכ he?X
      הֵאך (_ he?X||
      הֵאל he?l
      הֵאמ he?m
      הֵאם (_ he?m||
      הֵאנ he?n
      הֵאן (_ he?n||
      הֵאס he?s
      הֵאע he??
      הֵאפ he?f
      הֵאף (_ he?f||
      הֵאצ he?ts
      הֵאץ (_ he?ts||
      הֵאק he?k
      הֵאר he?Q
      הֵאש he?S
      הֵאשׁ he?S
      הֵאשׂ he?s
      הֵאת he?t
      הֵאאּ he??'
      הֵאבּ he?B'
      הֵאגּ he?g'
      הֵאדּ he?d'
      הֵאהּ he?h'
      הֵאוּ he?v'
      הֵאזּ he?z'
      הֵאחּ he?x'
      הֵאטּ he?t'
      הֵאיּ he?j'
      הֵאכּ he?k'
      הֵאךּ (_ he?k'||
      הֵאלּ he?l'
      הֵאמּ he?m'
      הֵאםּ (_ he?m'||
      הֵאנּ he?n'
      הֵאןּ (_ he?n'||
      הֵאסּ he?s'
      הֵאעּ he??'
      הֵאפּ he?p'
      הֵאףּ (_ he?p'||
      הֵאצּ he?t's
      הֵאץּ (_ he?t's||
      הֵאקּ he?k'
      הֵארּ he?Q'
      הֵאשּ he?S'
      הֵאשּׁ he?S'
      הֵאשּׂ he?s'
      הֵאתּ he?t'
      הֵה (% ha
      הֵהא heh?
      הֵהב hehv
      הֵהג hehg
      הֵהד hehd
      הֵהה hehh
      הֵהו hehv
      הֵהז hehz
      הֵהח hehx
      הֵהט heht
      הֵהי hehj
      הֵהכ hehX
      הֵהך (_ hehX||
      הֵהל hehl
      הֵהמ hehm
      הֵהם (_ hehm||
      הֵהנ hehn
      הֵהן (_ hehn||
      הֵהס hehs
      הֵהע heh?
      הֵהפ hehf
      הֵהף (_ hehf||
      הֵהצ hehts
      הֵהץ (_ hehts||
      הֵהק hehk
      הֵהר hehQ
      הֵהש hehS
      הֵהשׁ hehS
      הֵהשׂ hehs
      הֵהת heht
      הֵהאּ heh?'
      הֵהבּ hehB'
      הֵהגּ hehg'
      הֵהדּ hehd'
      הֵההּ hehh'
      הֵהוּ hehv'
      הֵהזּ hehz'
      הֵהחּ hehx'
      הֵהטּ heht'
      הֵהיּ hehj'
      הֵהכּ hehk'
      הֵהךּ (_ hehk'||
      הֵהלּ hehl'
      הֵהמּ hehm'
      הֵהםּ (_ hehm'||
      הֵהנּ hehn'
      הֵהןּ (_ hehn'||
      הֵהסּ hehs'
      הֵהעּ heh?'
      הֵהפּ hehp'
      הֵהףּ (_ hehp'||
      הֵהצּ heht's
      הֵהץּ (_ heht's||
      הֵהקּ hehk'
      הֵהרּ hehQ'
      הֵהשּ hehS'
      הֵהשּׁ hehS'
      הֵהשּׂ hehs'
      הֵהתּ heht'
      הֵי (% ha
      הֵיא hei?
      הֵיב heiv
      הֵיג heig
      הֵיד heid
      הֵיה heih
      הֵיו heiv
      הֵיז heiz
      הֵיח heix
      הֵיט heit
      הֵיי heij
      הֵיכ heiX
      הֵיך (_ heiX||
      הֵיל heil
      הֵימ heim
      הֵים (_ heim||
      הֵינ hein
      הֵין (_ hein||
      הֵיס heis
      הֵיע hei?
      הֵיפ heif
      הֵיף (_ heif||
      הֵיצ heits
      הֵיץ (_ heits||
      הֵיק heik
      הֵיר heiQ
      הֵיש heiS
      הֵישׁ heiS
      הֵישׂ heis
      הֵית heit
      הֵיאּ hei?'
      הֵיבּ heiB'
      הֵיגּ heig'
      הֵידּ heid'
      הֵיהּ heih'
      הֵיוּ heiv'
      הֵיזּ heiz'
      הֵיחּ heix'
      הֵיטּ heit'
      הֵייּ heij'
      הֵיכּ heik'
      הֵיךּ (_ heik'||
      הֵילּ heil'
      הֵימּ heim'
      הֵיםּ (_ heim'||
      הֵינּ hein'
      הֵיןּ (_ hein'||
      הֵיסּ heis'
      הֵיעּ hei?'
      הֵיפּ heip'
      הֵיףּ (_ heip'||
      הֵיצּ heit's
      הֵיץּ (_ heit's||
      הֵיקּ heik'
      הֵירּ heiQ'
      הֵישּ heiS'
      הֵישּׁ heiS'
      הֵישּׂ heis'
      הֵיתּ heit'
      הֻ (% ha
      הֻא hu?
      הֻב huv
      הֻג hug
      הֻד hud
      הֻה huh
      הֻו huv
      הֻז huz
      הֻח hux
      הֻט hut
      הֻי huj
      הֻכ huX
      הֻך (_ huX||
      הֻל hul
      הֻמ hum
      הֻם (_ hum||
      הֻנ hun
      הֻן (_ hun||
      הֻס hus
      הֻע hu?
      הֻפ huf
      הֻף (_ huf||
      הֻצ huts
      הֻץ (_ huts||
      הֻק huk
      הֻר huQ
      הֻש huS
      הֻשׁ huS
      הֻשׂ hus
      הֻת hut
      הֻאּ hu?'
      הֻבּ huB'
      הֻגּ hug'
      הֻדּ hud'
      הֻהּ huh'
      הֻוּ huv'
      הֻזּ huz'
      הֻחּ hux'
      הֻטּ hut'
      הֻיּ huj'
      הֻכּ huk'
      הֻךּ (_ huk'||
      הֻלּ hul'
      הֻמּ hum'
      הֻםּ (_ hum'||
      הֻנּ hun'
      הֻןּ (_ hun'||
      הֻסּ hus'
      הֻעּ hu?'
      הֻפּ hup'
      הֻףּ (_ hup'||
      הֻצּ hut's
      הֻץּ (_ hut's||
      הֻקּ huk'
      הֻרּ huQ'
      הֻשּ huS'
      הֻשּׁ huS'
      הֻשּׂ hus'
      הֻתּ hut'
      הֻא (% ha
      הֻאא hu??
      הֻאב hu?v
      הֻאג hu?g
      הֻאד hu?d
      הֻאה hu?h
      הֻאו hu?v
      הֻאז hu?z
      הֻאח hu?x
      הֻאט hu?t
      הֻאי hu?j
      הֻאכ hu?X
      הֻאך (_ hu?X||
      הֻאל hu?l
      הֻאמ hu?m
      הֻאם (_ hu?m||
      הֻאנ hu?n
      הֻאן (_ hu?n||
      הֻאס hu?s
      הֻאע hu??
      הֻאפ hu?f
      הֻאף (_ hu?f||
      הֻאצ hu?ts
      הֻאץ (_ hu?ts||
      הֻאק hu?k
      הֻאר hu?Q
      הֻאש hu?S
      הֻאשׁ hu?S
      הֻאשׂ hu?s
      הֻאת hu?t
      הֻאאּ hu??'
      הֻאבּ hu?B'
      הֻאגּ hu?g'
      הֻאדּ hu?d'
      הֻאהּ hu?h'
      הֻאוּ hu?v'
      הֻאזּ hu?z'
      הֻאחּ hu?x'
      הֻאטּ hu?t'
      הֻאיּ hu?j'
      הֻאכּ hu?k'
      הֻאךּ (_ hu?k'||
      הֻאלּ hu?l'
      הֻאמּ hu?m'
      הֻאםּ (_ hu?m'||
      הֻאנּ hu?n'
      הֻאןּ (_ hu?n'||
      הֻאסּ hu?s'
      הֻאעּ hu??'
      הֻאפּ hu?p'
      הֻאףּ (_ hu?p'||
      הֻאצּ hu?t's
      הֻאץּ (_ hu?t's||
      הֻאקּ hu?k'
      הֻארּ hu?Q'
      הֻאשּ hu?S'
      הֻאשּׁ hu?S'
      הֻאשּׂ hu?s'
      הֻאתּ hu?t'
      הֻה (% ha
      הֻהא huh?
      הֻהב huhv
      הֻהג huhg
      הֻהד huhd
      הֻהה huhh
      הֻהו huhv
      הֻהז huhz
      הֻהח huhx
      הֻהט huht
      הֻהי huhj
      הֻהכ huhX
      הֻהך (_ huhX||
      הֻהל huhl
      הֻהמ huhm
      הֻהם (_ huhm||
      הֻהנ huhn
      הֻהן (_ huhn||
      הֻהס huhs
      הֻהע huh?
      הֻהפ huhf
      הֻהף (_ huhf||
      הֻהצ huhts
      הֻהץ (_ huhts||
      הֻהק huhk
      הֻהר huhQ
      הֻהש huhS
      הֻהשׁ huhS
      הֻהשׂ huhs
      הֻהת huht
      הֻהאּ huh?'
      הֻהבּ huhB'
      הֻהגּ huhg'
      הֻהדּ huhd'
      הֻההּ huhh'
      הֻהוּ huhv'
      הֻהזּ huhz'
      הֻהחּ huhx'
      הֻהטּ huht'
      הֻהיּ huhj'
      הֻהכּ huhk'
      הֻהךּ (_ huhk'||
      הֻהלּ huhl'
      הֻהמּ huhm'
      הֻהםּ (_ huhm'||
      הֻהנּ huhn'
      הֻהןּ (_ huhn'||
      הֻהסּ huhs'
      הֻהעּ huh?'
      הֻהפּ huhp'
      הֻהףּ (_ huhp'||
      הֻהצּ huht's
      הֻהץּ (_ huht's||
      הֻהקּ huhk'
      הֻהרּ huhQ'
      הֻהשּ huhS'
      הֻהשּׁ huhS'
      הֻהשּׂ huhs'
      הֻהתּ huht'
      הֻי (% ha
      הֻיא hui?
      הֻיב huiv
      הֻיג huig
      הֻיד huid
      הֻיה huih
      הֻיו huiv
      הֻיז huiz
      הֻיח huix
      הֻיט huit
      הֻיי huij
      הֻיכ huiX
      הֻיך (_ huiX||
      הֻיל huil
      הֻימ huim
      הֻים (_ huim||
      הֻינ huin
      הֻין (_ huin||
      הֻיס huis
      הֻיע hui?
      הֻיפ huif
      הֻיף (_ huif||
      הֻיצ huits
      הֻיץ (_ huits||
      הֻיק huik
      הֻיר huiQ
      הֻיש huiS
      הֻישׁ huiS
      הֻישׂ huis
      הֻית huit
      הֻיאּ hui?'
      הֻיבּ huiB'
      הֻיגּ huig'
      הֻידּ huid'
      הֻיהּ huih'
      הֻיוּ huiv'
      הֻיזּ huiz'
      הֻיחּ huix'
      הֻיטּ huit'
      הֻייּ huij'
      הֻיכּ huik'
      הֻיךּ (_ huik'||
      הֻילּ huil'
      הֻימּ huim'
      הֻיםּ (_ huim'||
      הֻינּ huin'
      הֻיןּ (_ huin'||
      הֻיסּ huis'
      הֻיעּ hui?'
      הֻיפּ huip'
      הֻיףּ (_ huip'||
      הֻיצּ huit's
      הֻיץּ (_ huit's||
      הֻיקּ huik'
      הֻירּ huiQ'
      הֻישּ huiS'
      הֻישּׁ huiS'
      הֻישּׂ huis'
      הֻיתּ huit'
      הוּ (% ha
      הוּא hu?
      הוּב huv
      הוּג hug
      הוּד hud
      הוּה huh
      הוּו huv
      הוּז huz
      הוּח hux
      הוּט hut
      הוּי huj
      הוּכ huX
      הוּך (_ huX||
      הוּל hul
      הוּמ hum
      הוּם (_ hum||
      הוּנ hun
      הוּן (_ hun||
      הוּס hus
      הוּע hu?
      הוּפ huf
      הוּף (_ huf||
      הוּצ huts
      הוּץ (_ huts||
      הוּק huk
      הוּר huQ
      הוּש huS
      הוּשׁ huS
      הוּשׂ hus
      הוּת hut
      הוּאּ hu?'
      הוּבּ huB'
      הוּגּ hug'
      הוּדּ hud'
      הוּהּ huh'
      הוּוּ huv'
      הוּזּ huz'
      הוּחּ hux'
      הוּטּ hut'
      הוּיּ huj'
      הוּכּ huk'
      הוּךּ (_ huk'||
      הוּלּ hul'
      הוּמּ hum'
      הוּםּ (_ hum'||
      הוּנּ hun'
      הוּןּ (_ hun'||
      הוּסּ hus'
      הוּעּ hu?'
      הוּפּ hup'
      הוּףּ (_ hup'||
      הוּצּ hut's
      הוּץּ (_ hut's||
      הוּקּ huk'
      הוּרּ huQ'
      הוּשּ huS'
      הוּשּׁ huS'
      הוּשּׂ hus'
      הוּתּ hut'
      הוּא (% ha
      הוּאא hu??
      הוּאב hu?v
      הוּאג hu?g
      הוּאד hu?d
      הוּאה hu?h
      הוּאו hu?v
      הוּאז hu?z
      הוּאח hu?x
      הוּאט hu?t
      הוּאי hu?j
      הוּאכ hu?X
      הוּאך (_ hu?X||
      הוּאל hu?l
      הוּאמ hu?m
      הוּאם (_ hu?m||
      הוּאנ hu?n
      הוּאן (_ hu?n||
      הוּאס hu?s
      הוּאע hu??
      הוּאפ hu?f
      הוּאף (_ hu?f||
      הוּאצ hu?ts
      הוּאץ (_ hu?ts||
      הוּאק hu?k
      הוּאר hu?Q
      הוּאש hu?S
      הוּאשׁ hu?S
      הוּאשׂ hu?s
      הוּאת hu?t
      הוּאאּ hu??'
      הוּאבּ hu?B'
      הוּאגּ hu?g'
      הוּאדּ hu?d'
      הוּאהּ hu?h'
      הוּאוּ hu?v'
      הוּאזּ hu?z'
      הוּאחּ hu?x'
      הוּאטּ hu?t'
      הוּאיּ hu?j'
      הוּאכּ hu?k'
      הוּאךּ (_ hu?k'||
      הוּאלּ hu?l'
      הוּאמּ hu?m'
      הוּאםּ (_ hu?m'||
      הוּאנּ hu?n'
      הוּאןּ (_ hu?n'||
      הוּאסּ hu?s'
      הוּאעּ hu??'
      הוּאפּ hu?p'
      הוּאףּ (_ hu?p'||
      הוּאצּ hu?t's
      הוּאץּ (_ hu?t's||
      הוּאקּ hu?k'
      הוּארּ hu?Q'
      הוּאשּ hu?S'
      הוּאשּׁ hu?S'
      הוּאשּׂ hu?s'
      הוּאתּ hu?t'
      הוּה (% ha
      הוּהא huh?
      הוּהב huhv
      הוּהג huhg
      הוּהד huhd
      הוּהה huhh
      הוּהו huhv
      הוּהז huhz
      הוּהח huhx
      הוּהט huht
      הוּהי huhj
      הוּהכ huhX
      הוּהך (_ huhX||
      הוּהל huhl
      הוּהמ huhm
      הוּהם (_ huhm||
      הוּהנ huhn
      הוּהן (_ huhn||
      הוּהס huhs
      הוּהע huh?
      הוּהפ huhf
      הוּהף (_ huhf||
      הוּהצ huhts
      הוּהץ (_ huhts||
      הוּהק huhk
      הוּהר huhQ
      הוּהש huhS
      הוּהשׁ huhS
      הוּהשׂ huhs
      הוּהת huht
      הוּהאּ huh?'
      הוּהבּ huhB'
      הוּהגּ huhg'
      הוּהדּ huhd'
      הוּההּ huhh'
      הוּהוּ huhv'
      הוּהזּ huhz'
      הוּהחּ huhx'
      הוּהטּ huht'
      הוּהיּ huhj'
      הוּהכּ huhk'
